Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 14 Limited Partnerships

Cross references. —

For Uniform Partnership Act, see §§

17-21-101

through

17-21-1105

.

As to administration of the estate of a partner dying intestate by surviving partner, see §

2-4-201

.

For duty of surviving partner as to settlement of partnership business, see §

2-7-107

.

As to suits by or against partnerships, see Rule 17, W.R.C.P.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Partnership Taxation & The Limited Liability Company: Check Out the Check-the-Box Entity Classification,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 831 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 1231 to 1410.

Tort action for personal injury or property damage by partner against another partner or the partnership, 39 ALR4th 139.

47A C.J.S. Internal Revenue §§ 425 to 435; 68 C.J.S. Partnership § 402 et seq.